Connecticut, session 2026, HB05075.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-285a of the general
statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
concerning the reimbursement percentage that a local board of
education may be eligible to receive for a school building project, the
town of Windham may use the reimbursement rate of ninety-five per
cent for the renovation project at Windham High School (Project
Number 163-0079 RNV).